Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-124
Community work force program; administration; rules and regulations.

(1) In counties which have a county board of corrections, that board shall administer the community work force program and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for such administration. In all other counties, the sheriff shall administer the program and adopt and promulgate the rules and regulations therefor. In counties in which the sheriff administers the program, the sheriff shall submit for approval the proposed rules and regulations to the district court and the county court for such county.

(2) Such rules and regulations shall address, but shall not be limited to, the factors to be considered in assigning an inmate to a community service project. Included among these factors shall be (a) the physical and mental abilities of the inmate, (b) the benefit to the public of having the inmate work on the community service project, (c) the security of the jail, (d) the safety of the general public, (e) the number and type of supervisory personnel necessary, and (f) the likelihood of an attempted escape. No inmate shall be asked to perform unreasonably hazardous work that would endanger the life or health of the inmate or others.

Laws 1983, LB 180, § 3.